Vermont, session 2025-2026, S226.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 2479 is added to read:
§ 2479. VERMONT SISTER STATE PROGRAM
(a) Creation and purpose.
(1) The Vermont Sister State Program is created within the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development. The Agency shall provide support
to the Program and to the Sister State Program Committee as required.
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 2 of 8
(2) The purpose of the Program is to strengthen Vermont’s international
engagement and to foster mutually beneficial relationships with subnational
governments abroad, with a goal of promoting cultural exchange, economic
development, educational cooperation, and diplomatic collaboration.
(b) Program oversight.
(1) The Sister State Program Committee, composed of the following
members, shall oversee the Program:
(A) the Secretary of Commerce and Community Development or
designee;
(B) a member of the House of Representatives, appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(C) a member of the Senate, appointed by the Committee on
Committees;
(D) the Chair of the Board of Trustees of the Vermont Council on
World Affairs or designee;
(E) the Vermont Adjutant General or designee;
(F) the Chair of the Board of Trustees of the Vermont Arts Council
or designee; and
(G) three members, as follows:
(i) one member with expertise in cultural exchange or in Peace
Corps operations, appointed by the Governor;
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 3 of 8
(ii) one member representing a private institution of higher
education, appointed by the Committee on Committees; and
(iii) one member representing a public institution of higher
education, appointed by the Speaker of the House.
(2) Members of the Committee shall serve two-year terms, provided that
members appointed pursuant to subdivision (1)(G) of this subsection shall
serve initial terms of three years each to establish staggered terms. Members
may be reappointed.
(3) The Committee shall elect a chair and vice chair from among its
members that shall each serve a two-year term.
(4) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(c) Meetings.
(1) All meetings shall be called by the Chair, but in the event that the
Committee does not have a chair, a meeting may be called by the Secretary of
Commerce and Community Development or designee.
(2) The Committee shall meet:
(A) at least once quarterly, for the purpose of:
(i) evaluating current Sister State Program agreements;
(ii) proposing new Sister State Program agreements;
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 4 of 8
(iii) preparing its annual report; or
(iv) discussing any other matter that the Committee deems
relevant to its work; and
(B) to review and score an eligible Sister State Program application
not later than 30 days after the Committee receives the application from the
Agency, pursuant to subdivision (d)(3) of this section.
(d) Program application, review, and approval procedures.
(1) Development of application process. The Committee, in
consultation with the Agency of Commerce and Community Development,
shall develop a process by which an entity can apply and be considered for
admission as a partner to the Sister State Program. This process shall include
the development of:
(A) an official application to be in the Program;
(B) a confidential internal review procedure to be used by the
Agency to review Program applicants for sensitive political, legal, ethical, and
strategic factors;
(C) minimum eligibility requirements to be considered for the
Program;
(D) a fixed-scoring system, including a rubric, to be uniformly
applied by the Committee to evaluate all eligible applications; and
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 5 of 8
(E) a memorandum of understanding template to be used and signed
by the State and an approved Sister State Program partner.
(2) Agency initial verification.
(A) When a Sister State Program application has been received by
the Agency pursuant to this section, the Agency shall, before the Committee
may meet to review the application:
(i) verify that the application meets the Program’s minimum
eligibility requirements; and
(ii) conduct a confidential internal review of the applicant.
(B) Not later than 10 days after completion of the Agency’s initial
verification and review of an application pursuant to subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (2), the Agency shall send the Committee a copy of the application
along with a summary of the Agency’s analysis.
(C) The confidential internal review process conducted in subdivision
(A)(ii) of this subdivision (2), along with any and all documents that take place
during that process, shall be exempt from public inspection and copying.
(3) Committee review and recommendation.
(A) The Committee, upon receiving an application that has received
preliminary approval from the Agency, shall meet to review the application
pursuant to subdivision (c)(2)(B) of this section not later than 30 days after
receipt of the application from the Agency.
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 6 of 8
(B) The Committee shall, not later than 30 days after completing its
review of an application pursuant to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3),
submit its final recommendation to the Governor along with a copy of the
application.
(C) The final recommendation pursuant to subdivision (B) of this
subdivision (3) shall either be that the Committee recommends the application
be approved or that the Committee recommends the application be
disapproved.
(4) Governor’s review.
(A) The Governor shall have the sole authority to issue final approval
or disapproval of a Sister State Program application that the Committee
recommended be approved. The Governor shall not review or approve of a
Program application that the Committee recommended be disapproved. The
Governor shall send written notice of the Governor’s decision to the Agency
not later than 10 days after the Governor’s decision.
(B) If the Governor disapproves a Program application, the
Governor’s notice in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (4) shall include a
written explanation of why the Governor did not follow the recommendation of
the Committee.
(C) Upon the Agency’s receipt of the Governor’s decision pursuant
to subdivision (A) of this subdivision (4), the Agency shall notify the applicant
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 7 of 8
of the Governor’s decision not later than 30 days after the Agency receives
notice of the Governor’s decision.
(D) If the application is approved by the Governor, the Agency shall
finalize a memorandum of understanding between the State and the Sister State
Program applicant.
(e) Reporting. The Committee shall submit an annual report not later than
January 15 of each year to the Governor and to the House Committee on
Commerce and Economic Development and the Senate Committee on
Economic Development, Housing and General Affairs that includes the
following:
(1) an executive summary of key development and outcomes of the
Program;
(2) a description of Committee activities, including a summary of
attendance and decisions at its meetings;
(3) updates on the Program, including an evaluation of sister state
applications, new partners, significant developments, metrics of success, and
challenges;
(4) recommendations for new sister state agreements, along with the
rationale for the recommendations and how they align with Vermont’s
strategic interests and capacity;
VT LEG #385578 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.226
2026 Page 8 of 8
(5) a description of stakeholder engagement with the Program;
(6) a financial overview, including a summary of funding sources and
expenditures; and
(7) an outlook for the Program, which shall include strategic objectives,
potential new agreements, and growth opportunities for the next year.
(f) Compensation and reimbursement.
(1) For attendance at meetings during adjournment of the General
Assembly, a legislative member of the Committee serving in the member’s
capacity as a legislator shall be entitled to per diem compensation and
reimbursement of expenses pursuant to 2 V.S.A. § 23 for not more than eight
meetings per year.
(2) Other members of the Committee shall be entitled to per diem
compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A.
§ 1010 for not more than eight meetings per year.
(3) Payments to members of the Committee authorized under this
subsection shall be made from monies appropriated to the Agency of
Commerce and Community Development.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385578 v.1